Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-927
Person offering to vote; challenge; oath required; compliance with sections required.

If any person offering to vote is challenged by an inspector, judge or clerk of election, or registered voter, the person shall, in the presence of an inspector or a judge of election, affix his or her signature and print his or her name and address on the following oath: I do solemnly swear that I will fully and truly answer all such questions put to me related to my place of residence and qualifications as a registered voter at this election. The inspector or judge of election shall require the registered voter to comply with sections 32-928 to 32-930 as applicable and shall ask any other questions to the person challenged as necessary to test his or her qualifications as a registered voter at that election.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 270.